Nevada, session 83, SB90.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Department of Education the sum of
$15,000,000 for the Other State Education Programs budget account
for the purpose of creating a grant program to allow teachers and
specialized instructional support personnel to obtain necessary
supplies and materials for their classrooms or school operations,
respectively.
2. Of the sum appropriated by subsection 1, the Department
shall not expend more than $7,500,000 in Fiscal Year 2025-2026.
3. The Department shall enter into an agreement with one or
more organizations to provide such organizations with a grant from
the Department to administer a program whereby the organizations
expend grant money to directly provide teachers and specialized
instructional support personnel with necessary supplies and
materials for their classrooms or school operations, respectively, in
response to a request from such persons.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, an
agreement made pursuant to subsection 3 shall require that an
organization that receives grant money expend not more than $500
per individual teacher or specialized instructional support personnel
following a request made pursuant to subsection 3. An individual
teacher or specialized instructional support personnel may request
the organization expend money in excess of $500 and, to the extent
that money from a source other than the grant program established
pursuant to this section is available, such a request may be fulfilled.
5. As used in this section, “specialized instructional support
personnel” includes persons employed by a school to provide
necessary services such as assessment, diagnosis, counseling,
educational services, therapeutic services and related services, as
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(26), to pupils. Such persons employed
by a school include, without limitation:
(a) A school counselor;
(b) A school psychologist;
(c) A school social worker;
(d) A school nurse;
(e) A speech-language pathologist;
(f) A school library media specialist; and
(g) Any other qualified professional.
Sec. 2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
section 1 of this act must not be committed for expenditure after
June 30, 2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or
any entity to which money from the appropriation is granted or
otherwise transferred in any manner, and any portion of the
appropriated money remaining must not be spent for any purpose
after September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money
was appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)